Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-790
Notification to trustee; resignation; recall election; how conducted.

(1) If the recall petition is found to be sufficient, the filing clerk shall notify the trustee whose removal is sought and the board of trustees of the sanitary and improvement district that sufficient signatures have been gathered.

(2) If the trustee does not resign within five days after receiving the notice, the filing clerk shall order an election to be held not less than forty-five days nor more than sixty days after the expiration of the five-day period, except that if an election for the board of trustees of the district is to be held within one hundred twenty days after the expiration of the five-day period, the filing clerk shall provide for the holding of the removal election at the time of such regular election. The recall election shall be conducted in the same manner as an election for members of the board of trustees as provided in section 31-735. After the filing clerk sets the date for the recall election, the recall election shall be held regardless of whether the trustee whose removal is sought resigns before the recall election is held.

Laws 1997, LB 874, § 5.